District of Columbia statutes.
2-1375

Translations of District publications relating to health, safety and welfare in Chinese, Vietnamese and Korean.

(a)

The Mayor shall make available to persons whose primary language of communication is Chinese, Vietnamese, or Korean, a text version translated into these languages of any District of Columbia government published application, informational brochure or pamphlet which is essential to obtain services relating to the health, safety, and welfare of Asian or Pacific Islander residents of the District of Columbia. The Mayor shall by regulation designate, in consultation with the Commission, not later than 60 days after October 3, 2001, the applications, brochures, and pamphlets which shall be translated.

(b)

The Mayor shall maintain a statistical record of the distribution and use of the materials that are distributed pursuant to subsection (a) of this section.

(c)

The Mayor may issue regulations to implement subsection (a) of this section in accordance with the provisions of subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2.

History

Oct. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 14-28, § 306, 48 DCR 6981

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 306 of Fiscal Year 2002 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-124, August 3, 2001, 48 DCR 7861).